Hawaii statutes.
§326-34 County of Kalawao; governance.
(a) The county of Kalawao shall consist of that portion of the island of
Molokai known as Kalaupapa, Kalawao, and Waikolu, and commonly known or
designated as the Kalaupapa Settlement, and shall not be or form a portion of
the county of Maui, but is constituted a county by itself. As a county it
shall have only the powers especially conferred and given by sections 326-34 to
326-38 and, except as provided in those sections, none of the provisions of the
Hawaii Revised Statutes regarding counties shall be deemed to refer to or shall
be applicable to the county of Kalawao.

(b) The county of Kalawao shall be under the
jurisdiction and control of the department of health and be governed by the
laws, and rules relating to the department and the care and treatment of
persons affected with Hansen's disease, except as otherwise provided by law. [L
1905, c 39, §2; RL 1925, §1577; am L 1931, c 138, §1; am imp L 1933, c 118,
§§1, 2; RL 1935, §2928; RL 1945, §2438; am L 1949, c 53, §26; am L 1951, c 157,
§15; RL 1955, §50-35; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS §326-34; am L 1969, c 152,
§8; am L 1981, c 185, §16; am L 1988, c 263, §10]

Cross References

District of Kalawao, see §4-1.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next